Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 2. Form, Formation, and Readjustment of Contract.

Sec. 45.02.201.
Formal requirements; statute of frauds.

Except as otherwise provided in this section a contract for the sale of goods, including the sale or transfer of a boat or vessel, for the price of $500 or more is not enforceable by action or defense unless there is a writing sufficient to indicate that a contract for sale has been made between the parties and signed by the party against whom enforcement is sought or by an authorized agent or broker of that party. A writing is not insufficient because it omits or incorrectly states a term agreed upon but the contract is not enforceable under this subsection beyond the quantity of goods shown in such writing.

Between merchants if within a reasonable time a writing in confirmation of the contract and sufficient against the sender is received and the party receiving it has reason to know its contents, it satisfies the requirements of (a) of this section against the party unless written notice of objection to its contents is given within 10 days after it is received.

A contract that does not satisfy the requirements of (a) of this section but that is valid in other respects is enforceable

if the goods are to be specially manufactured for the buyer and are not suitable for sale to others in the ordinary course of the seller’s business and the seller, before notice of repudiation is received and under circumstances that reasonably indicate that the goods are for the buyer, has made either a substantial beginning of their manufacture or commitments for their procurement;

if the party against whom enforcement is sought admits in a pleading, in testimony, or in court that a contract for sale was made, but the contract is not enforceable under this provision beyond the quantity of goods admitted; or

with respect to goods for which payment has been made and accepted or that have been received and accepted (AS

45.02.606

).

History.

(§ 2.201 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Sec. 45.02.202.
Final written expression; parol or extrinsic evidence.

Terms with respect to which the confirmatory memoranda of the parties agree, or that are otherwise set out in a writing intended by the parties as a final expression of their agreement with respect to the terms included in the writing, may not be contradicted by evidence of a prior agreement or of a contemporaneous oral agreement, but may be explained or supplemented

by course of performance, course of dealing, or usage of trade (AS

45.01.303

); and

by evidence of consistent additional terms unless the court finds the writing was intended also as a complete and exclusive statement of the terms of the agreement.

History.

(§ 2.202 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 14 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to the 2009 amendment of this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective January 1, 2010, rewrote (1), which read, “by course of dealing or usage of trade (AS 45.01.205) or by course of performance (AS

45.02.208

)”.

Sec. 45.02.203.
Seals inoperative.

The affixing of a seal to a writing evidencing a contract for sale or an offer to buy or sell goods does not make the writing a sealed instrument and the law with respect to sealed instruments does not apply to the contract or offer.

History.

(§ 2.203 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Collateral references. —

67 Am. Jur. 2d, Sales, § 104.

Sec. 45.02.204.
Formation in general.

A contract for sale of goods may be made in any manner sufficient to show agreement, including conduct by both parties that recognizes the existence of the contract.

An agreement sufficient to be a contract for sale may be found even though the moment of its making is undetermined.

Even though one or more terms are left open, a contract for sale does not fail for indefiniteness if the parties intended to make a contract and there is a reasonably certain basis for giving an appropriate remedy.

History.

(§ 2.204 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Sec. 45.02.205.
Firm offers.

An offer by a merchant to buy or sell goods in a signed writing that by its terms gives assurance that it will be held open is not revocable, for lack of consideration, during the time stated or if no time is stated for a reasonable time, but in no event may the period or irrevocability exceed three months.
A term of assurance on a form supplied by the offeree must be separately signed by the offeror.

History.

(§ 2.205 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Collateral references. —

67 Am. Jur. 2d, Sales, § 132.

Sec. 45.02.206.
Offer and acceptance in formation of contract.

Unless otherwise unambiguously indicated by the language or circumstances

an offer to make a contract shall be construed as inviting acceptance in any manner and by any medium reasonable in the circumstances;

an order or other offer to buy goods for prompt or current shipment shall be construed as inviting acceptance either by a prompt promise to ship or by the prompt or current shipment of conforming or nonconforming goods, but a shipment of nonconforming goods does not constitute an acceptance if the seller seasonably notifies the buyer that the shipment is offered only as an accommodation to the buyer.

If the beginning of a requested performance is a reasonable mode of acceptance, an offeror who is not notified of acceptance within a reasonable time may treat the offer as having lapsed before acceptance.

History.

(§ 2.206 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Collateral references. —

67 Am. Jur. 2d, Sales, § 124 et seq.

Sec. 45.02.207.
Additional terms in acceptance or confirmation.

A definite and seasonable expression of acceptance or a written confirmation that is sent within a reasonable time operates as an acceptance even though it states terms additional to or different from those offered or agreed upon, unless acceptance is expressly made conditional on assent to the additional or different terms.

The additional terms are to be construed as proposals for addition to the contract. Between merchants these terms become part of the contract unless

the offer expressly limits acceptance to the terms of the offer;

they materially alter it; or

notification of objection to them has already been given or is given within a reasonable time after notice of them is received.

Conduct by both parties that recognizes the existence of a contract is sufficient to establish a contract for sale although the writings of the parties do not otherwise establish a contract. In this case the terms of the particular contract consist of those terms on which the writings of the parties agree, together with supplementary terms incorporated under other provisions of the code.

History.

(§ 2.207 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1993, under § 13, ch. 34, SLA 1993 and § 128, ch. 35, SLA 1993 the citation to the Uniform Commercial Code was revised.

Sec. 45.02.208.
Course of performance or practical construction. [Repealed, § 113 ch 44 SLA 2009.]

Sec. 45.02.209.
Modification, rescission, and waiver.

An agreement modifying a contract within this chapter needs no consideration to be binding.

A signed agreement that excludes modification or rescission except by a signed writing cannot be otherwise modified or rescinded, but except as between merchants such a requirement on a form supplied by the merchant must be separately signed by the other party.

The requirements of the statute of frauds section (AS

45.02.201

) must be satisfied if the contract as modified is within its provision.

Although an attempt at modification or rescission does not satisfy the requirements of (b) or (c) of this section it can operate as a waiver.

A party who has made a waiver affecting an executory portion of the contract may retract the waiver by reasonable notification received by the other party that strict performance will be required of any term waived, unless the retraction would be unjust in view of a material change of position in reliance on the waiver.

History.

(§ 2.209 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Sec. 45.02.210.
Delegation of performance; assignment of rights.

A party may perform the party’s duty through a delegate unless otherwise agreed or unless the other party has a substantial interest in having the original promisor perform or control the acts required by the contract. No delegation of performance relieves the party delegating of a duty to perform or a liability for breach.

Unless otherwise agreed, all rights of either seller or buyer can be assigned except where the assignment would materially change the duty of the other party, increase materially the burden or risk imposed on the other party by the contract, or impair materially the chance of obtaining return performance. A right to damages for breach of the whole contract or a right arising out of the assignor’s due performance of the entire obligation can be assigned despite agreement otherwise.

The creation, attachment, perfection, or enforcement of a security interest in the seller’s interest under a contract is not a transfer that materially changes the duty of or increases materially the burden or risk imposed on the buyer or impairs materially the buyer’s chance of obtaining return performance within the purview of (b) of this section unless, and then only to the extent that, enforcement actually results in a delegation of material performance of the seller; even in that event, the creation, attachment, perfection, and enforcement of the security interest remain effective, but

the seller is liable to the buyer for damages caused by the delegation to the extent that the damages could not reasonably be prevented by the buyer; and

a court having jurisdiction may grant other appropriate relief, including cancellation of the contract for sale or an injunction against enforcement of the security interest or consummation of the enforcement.

Unless the circumstances indicate the contrary, a prohibition of assignment of “the contract” is to be construed as barring only the delegation to the assignee of the assignor’s performance.

An assignment of “the contract” or “all my rights under the contract” or an assignment in similar general terms is an assignment of rights and, unless the language or the circumstances, as in an assignment for security, indicate the contrary, it is a delegation of performance of the duties of the assignor and its acceptance by the assignee constitutes a promise by the assignee to perform those duties. This promise is enforceable by either the assignor or the other party to the original contract.

The other party may treat an assignment that delegates performance as creating reasonable grounds for insecurity and may, without prejudice to the party’s rights against the assignor, demand assurances from the assignee (AS

45.02.609

).

History.

(§ 2.210 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 8 ch 113 SLA 2000)